Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Sec. 32.11.800.
Construction and application.

This chapter shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it, except to the extent that certain provisions of this chapter have been revised and are not identical to the Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 20 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 775-777.

Sec. 32.11.810.
Name.

The name of a limited partnership as set out in its certificate of limited partnership

must contain without abbreviation the words “limited partnership”;

may not contain the name of a limited partner unless

it is also the name of a general partner or the corporate name of a corporate general partner; or

the business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner; and

must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name; in this paragraph, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement (a)(3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 87 SLA 1994; am §§ 32, 33 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of the amendments to this section made by §§ 32 and 33, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 789.

Sec. 32.11.820.
Reservation of name.

The exclusive right to the use of a name may be reserved by

a person intending to organize a limited partnership under this chapter and to adopt that name;

a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered in this state that, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

a foreign limited partnership intending to register in this state and adopt that name; or

a person intending to organize a foreign limited partnership and intending to have it register in this state and adopt that name.

The reservation shall be made by filing with the department an application, executed by the applicant, to reserve a specified name. If the department finds that the name is available for use by a domestic or foreign limited partnership under AS

32.11.810

, the department shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of 120 days. Once having reserved a name, the same applicant may not again reserve the same name until more than 60 days after the expiration of the last 120-day period for which that applicant reserved that name. The right to the exclusive use of a reserved name may be transferred to another person by filing with the department a notice of the transfer executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 34 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to (b) of this section made by § 34, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 789.

Sec. 32.11.830.
Specified office and agent.

A limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this state

an office, which may but need not be a place of its business in this state, at which shall be kept the records required by AS

32.11.840

to be maintained; and

an agent for service of process on the limited partnership, which agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state.

A limited partnership may change its registered office, registered agent, or both, by filing with the department a statement signed by a general partner stating

the name of the limited partnership;

the address of its registered office;

the address of its new registered office if the registered office is being changed;

the name of its registered agent;

the name of its new registered agent if the registered agent is being changed; and

a statement that the change has been approved by all of the general partners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 44 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 32.11.835.
Amendment of partnership agreement.

Unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise, a partnership agreement may not be amended except with the unanimous consent of all partners.

History.

(§ 21 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].”

Sec. 32.11.840.
Records to be kept.

A limited partnership shall keep at the office referred to in AS

32.11.830(a)(1)

the following:

a current list of the full name and last known business address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners in alphabetical order and the limited partners in alphabetical order;

a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment to it, together with executed copies of a power of attorney under which a certificate has been executed;

copies of the limited partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

copies of a then-effective written partnership agreement and of a financial statement of the limited partnership for the three most recent years;

unless contained in a written partnership agreement, a writing setting out

the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and that each partner has agreed to contribute;

the times at which or events on the happening of which additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

the right of a partner to receive, or of a general partner to make, distributions to a partner that include a return of all or a part of the partner’s contribution;

events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up; and

a copy of any statement of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication filed under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act).

Records kept under this section are subject to inspection and copying at the reasonable request and at the expense of a partner during ordinary business hours.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 20 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 26 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(6), and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, (a)(6) of this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.

Sec. 32.11.850.
Nature of business.

A limited partnership may carry on business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.860.
Business transactions of partner with partnership.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations as a person who is not a partner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

68 C.J.S., Partnership, §§ 161-171.

Sec. 32.11.870.
Filing fees.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership that files a certificate of limited partnership, amendment, cancellation, or registration, or other application with the department, shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee established by the department by regulation. The filing fee must be uniform and fixed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 32.11.890.
Rules for cases not covered by chapter.

In a case not provided for in this chapter, the provisions of AS 32.06 govern, except as provided by AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 27 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section, which read, “In a case not provided for in this chapter, including conversion of a limited partnership to a partnership, the provisions of AS 32.06 govern.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10(a) and (c), ch. 115, SLA 2000 set out the applicability of the 2000 amendment of this section during the period on or after January 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2004.
Sec. 10(d), ch. 115, SLA 2000 directs that “If, under (a) of this section, [the 2000 amendment to this section does] not apply to a partnership or limited partnership, . . . , AS

32.11.890

, as the section existed before being amended by this Act . . . [applies] to the partnership or limited partnership.”
See sec. 10, ch. 115, SLA 2000, as set out in the editor’s notes preceding AS 32.06 or as set out in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Under section 11, ch. 115, SLA 2000, this section does “not affect an action or proceeding begun or a right accrued before January 1, 2001.”

Sec. 32.11.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate referred to in AS

32.11.010

and the certificate as amended or restated;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“contribution” means cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, that a partner contributes to a limited partnership as a partner;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“event of withdrawal of a general partner” means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner under AS

32.11.160

;

“foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed under the laws of a state other than this state and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners;

“general partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and named in the certificate of limited partnership as a general partner;

“limited partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

“limited partnership” except when used in the phrases “foreign limited partnership” and “foreign limited liability limited partnership,” and “domestic limited partnership” mean a partnership formed by two or more persons under this chapter, or that becomes subject to this chapter, and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners;

“partner” means a limited or general partner;

“partnership agreement” means a valid agreement, written or oral, of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business;

“partnership interest” means a partner’s share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets;

“state” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 27 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (9), which read, “ ‘limited partnership’ and ‘domestic limited partnership’ mean a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this state and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 778-780.

Sec. 32.11.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Revised Limited Partnership Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 22 ch 78 SLA 1997)